Maine, session 132, LD1192.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 24-A MRSA §4303-F, sub-§1, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 241, §3, is
amended to read:
A. If the ambulance service provider participates in the carrier's network, the The
carrier shall reimburse at the ambulance service provider's rate or 200% 400% of the
Medicare rate for that service, whichever is less, plus any adjustment required by
paragraph C.
Sec. 2. 24-A MRSA §4303-F, sub-§1, ¶B, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 241, §3, is
repealed.
Sec. 3. 24-A MRSA §4303-F, sub-§1, ¶D, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 241, §3, is
repealed.
Sec. 4. 24-A MRSA §4303-F, sub-§1-A, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 468, §2,
is amended to read:
A. If the ambulance service provider participates in the carrier's network, the The
carrier shall reimburse the ambulance service provider at the ambulance service
provider's rate or 200% 400% of the average of the Medicare rate for basic life support
services and the Medicare rate for advanced life support services, whichever is less,
plus any adjustment required by paragraph C.
Sec. 5. 24-A MRSA §4303-F, sub-§1-A, ¶B, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 468, §2,
is repealed.
Sec. 6. 24-A MRSA §4303-F, sub-§1-A, ¶D, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 468, §2,
is repealed.